North Carolina, session 2025, SB552.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PROVIDE FUNDING FOR STATE WAREHOUSE TO BE REPAID BY FUNDS
RECEIVED BY THE ABC COMMISSION
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund
to the Department of Administration the sum of three hundred nine million five hundred
sixty-eight thousand five hundred sixty-three dollars ($309,568,563) for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year to be used for advanced planning and construction of a new automated warehouse and
associated offices for the North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission (ABC). Upon
the earlier of project completion or July 1, 2029, the ABC shall repay the total amount of funds
appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund for the project in an amount of no
less than twenty million six hundred seventy thousand dollars ($20,670,000) annually.
Reimbursement funds submitted by ABC pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the State
Capital and Infrastructure Fund. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to preclude the
payment of amounts in excess of the minimum prescribed annual amount.
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

ESTABLISH SERVICE BUSINESS PERMIT
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 18B-300(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) Consumption on Premises During Time of Permit Revocation or Suspension. – It shall
be unlawful to consume or for a permittee or his a permittee's agent or employee to allow the
consumption of malt beverages or unfortified wine on the premises of any business during the
period of time that any on-premises permit or service business permit issued to the business
authorizing the sale andor consumption of malt beverages or unfortified wine has been suspended
or revoked by the Commission. The prohibition in this subsection does not apply to the premises
upon which the business was located at the time the permit was suspended or revoked if the
business ceases to operate in that location and the owner of the property is not the permittee,
provided that the permittee is not engaged in any other business or other activity on the premises
during the period of suspension or revocation."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 18B-603 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(i) Service Business Permits. – The Commission may only issue service business permits
provided for in G.S. 18B-1001(26) to qualified persons and establishments located within a
jurisdiction in which on-premises malt beverage permits or on-premises unfortified wine permits
may be issued, subject to the following restrictions:
*S552-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) If on-premises malt beverage permits, but not on-premises unfortified wine
permits, may be issued in the jurisdiction, the service business permittee may
furnish only malt beverages to customers.
(2) If on-premises unfortified wine permits, but not on-premises malt beverage
permits, may be issued in the jurisdiction, the service business permittee may
furnish only unfortified wine to customers.
(3) If on-premises malt beverage permits and on-premises unfortified wine
permits may be issued in the jurisdiction, the service business permittee may
furnish malt beverages and unfortified wine to customers."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 18B-902 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18B-902. Application for permit; fees.
…
(d) Fees. – An application for an ABC permit shall be accompanied by payment of the
following application fee:
…
(57) Service business permit – $50.00.
…
(h) Recycling Plan Required. – Each applicant for an on-premises malt beverage permit,
on-premises unfortified wine permit, service business permit, on-premises fortified wine permit,
or a mixed beverages permit shall prepare and submit with the application a plan for the collection
and recycling of all recyclable beverage containers of all beverages to be sold or furnished at
retail on the premises. Each applicant for a mobile bar services permit shall prepare and submit
with the application a plan for the collection and recycling of all recyclable beverage containers
of all beverages to be served at an event pursuant to the permit. A permittee who is not able to
find a recycler for its beverage containers may apply to the Alcoholic Beverage Control
Commission for a one-year stay of the requirement to implement a recycling program in
compliance with G.S. 18B-1006.1. The application shall be made in a form specified by the
Commission, shall detail the efforts made by the permittee to provide for the collection and
recycling of beverage containers, and shall specify the impediments to implementation of a
recycling plan. The Commission shall submit all such applications to the Division of
Environmental Assistance and Outreach of the Department of Environmental Quality for review
and certification. The Division of Environmental Assistance and Outreach shall investigate each
application and prepare a summary of its investigation and shall submit the summary to the
Commission along with a notation indicating certification or denial of the application. A
permittee whose application for a stay is certified by the Division of Environmental Assistance
and Outreach shall not be required to comply with the recycling requirement of the alcoholic
beverage laws and regulations during the one-year stay period so certified."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 18B-903 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18B-903. Duration of permit; renewal and transfer.
(a) Duration. – Once issued, ABC permits shall be valid for the following periods, unless
earlier surrendered, suspended or revoked:
(1) On-premises and off-premises malt beverage, unfortified wine, and fortified
wine permits; service business permits; culinary permits; and all permits listed
in G.S. 18B-1100 shall remain valid indefinitely.
…
(b1) Registration. – Each person holding a malt beverage, fortified wine, or unfortified
wine permit unfortified wine, or service business permit issued pursuant to G.S. 18B-902(d)(1)
through G.S. 18B-902(d)(6) or G.S. 18B-902(d)(57) shall register by May 1 of each year on a
form provided by the Commission, in order to provide information needed by the State in
enforcing this Chapter and to support the costs of that enforcement. For permits issued pursuant
to G.S. 18B-902(d)(1) through G.S. 18B-902(d)(6), theThe registration required by this
Page 2 Senate Bill 552-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subsection shall be accompanied by an annual registration and inspection fee of four hundred
dollars ($400.00) for each permit held. For permits issued pursuant to G.S. 18B-902(d)(57), the
registration required by this subsection shall be accompanied by an annual registration and
inspection fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each permit held. The fee shall be paid by May 1 of
each year. A registration fee shall not be refundable. Failure to pay the annual registration and
inspection fee shall result in revocation of the permit.
(b2) Recycling Plan Required. – Each person holding an on-premises malt beverage
permit, on-premises unfortified wine permit, service business permit, on-premises fortified wine
permit, or a mixed beverages permit shall submit, along with the annual registration or renewal
application, either a current plan for the collection and recycling of all recyclable beverage
containers of all beverages sold or furnished at retail on the premises, or an application for a
waiver pursuant to G.S. 18B-902(h). Each person holding a mobile bar services permit shall
submit, along with the annual renewal application, either a current plan for the collection and
recycling of all recyclable beverage containers of all beverages to be served at an event pursuant
to the permit, or an application for a waiver pursuant to G.S. 18B-902(h).
…."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 18B-1000 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18B-1000. Definitions concerning establishments.
The following requirements and definitions shall apply to this Chapter:
…
(7a) Service business. – An establishment that is primarily engaged in the business
of providing services to the general public that require an occupational license
issued by the State.
(7a)(7b) Sports and entertainment venue. – Stadiums, ballparks, and other similar
facilities with a permanently constructed seating capacity of 3,000 or more
which are not located on the campus of a school, college, or university.
…."
SECTION 2.(f) G.S. 18B-1001 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) Service Business Permit. – A service business permit authorizes the permittee
to furnish complimentary malt beverages and unfortified wine to customers,
in conjunction with the provision of the service, for consumption on the
permittee's premises at no extra charge to the customers. The permittee may
furnish alcoholic beverages to customers only in accordance with
G.S. 18B-603(i). The permittee may not serve more than two servings of
alcoholic beverages to any individual customer in any calendar day. For
purposes of this subdivision, a serving of malt beverage is 16 fluid ounces,
and a serving of unfortified wine is 8 fluid ounces. Notwithstanding
G.S. 18B-1006(h), the permittee may purchase malt beverages and unfortified
wine from either a retailer or a wholesaler. The permit may be issued to service
businesses."
SECTION 2.(g) G.S. 18B-1006.1(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Holders of on-premises malt beverage permits, on-premises unfortified wine permits,
service business permits, on-premises fortified wine permits, and mixed beverages permits shall
separate, store, and provide for the collection for recycling of all recyclable beverage containers
of all beverages sold or furnished at retail on the premises. A permittee has satisfied the
requirements of this section if it implements a recycling program that meets the minimum
standards of the model recycling program developed by the Commission pursuant to
G.S. 130A-309.14(m). Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall not be
grounds for revocation of a permit. A conviction for violation of this section shall not constitute
an alcoholic beverage offense within the meaning of G.S. 18B-900(a)(4)."
SECTION 2.(h) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 552-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

OPEN CONTAINER LAW CORRECTION
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 18B-1001 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18B-1001. Kinds of ABC permits; places eligible.
When the issuance of the permit is lawful in the jurisdiction in which the premises are located,
the Commission may issue the following kinds of permits:
…
(3) On-Premises Unfortified Wine Permit. – An on-premises unfortified wine
permit authorizes (i) the retail sale of unfortified wine for consumption on the
premises, either alone or mixed with other beverages, (ii) the retail sale of
unfortified wine in the manufacturer's original container for consumption off
the premises, and (iii) the retail sale of unfortified wine dispensed from a tap
connected to a pressurized container utilizing carbon dioxide or similar gas
into a cleaned and sanitized container that is filled or refilled and sealed for
consumption off the premises and that identifies the permittee and the date the
container was filled or refilled. The permit also authorizes the permittee to
transfer unfortified wine, not more than four times per calendar year, to
another on-premises unfortified wine permittee that is under common
ownership or control as the transferor. Except as authorized by this
subdivision, transfers of wine by on-premises unfortified wine permittees,
purchases of wine by a retail permittee from another retail permittee for the
purpose of resale, and sale of wine by a retail permittee to another retail
permittee for the purpose of resale are unlawful. In addition, a particular brand
of wine may be transferred only if both the transferor and transferee are
located within the territory designated between the winery and the wholesaler
on file with the Commission. Prior to or contemporaneous with any such
transfer, the transferor shall notify each wholesaler who distributes the
transferred product of the transfer. The notice shall be in writing or verifiable
electronic format and shall identify the transferor and transferee, the date of
the transfer, quantity, and items transferred. The holder of the permit is
authorized to ship unfortified wine in closed containers to individual
purchasers inside and outside the State. Orders received by a winery by
telephone, Internet, mail, facsimile, or other off-premises means of
communication shall be shipped pursuant to a wine shipper permit and not
pursuant to this subdivision. The permit may be issued for any of the
following:
a. Restaurants.
b. Hotels.
c. Eating establishments.
d. Private clubs.
e. Convention centers.
f. Cooking schools.
g. Community theatres.
h. Wineries.
i. Wine producers.
j. Retail businesses.
k. Sports and entertainment venues.
l. Bars.
m. The holder of a distillery permit authorized under G.S. 18B-1105.
n. Breweries.
Page 4 Senate Bill 552-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Additionally, an on-premises unfortified wine permit authorizes a permittee
that is a restaurant, eating establishment, hotel, private club, bar, brewery,
winery, or wine producer to sell at retail single-serving unfortified wine drinks
for consumption off the premises, including delivery by the permittee or a
delivery service permittee. Single-serving unfortified wine drinks sold for
consumption off the premises must be sold with food and shall be packaged
in a container with a secure lid or cap and in a manner designed to prevent
consumption without removal of the lid or cap. The container shall be no
greater than 24 fluid ounces. Notwithstanding In accordance with
G.S. 20-138.7, the transportation of single-serving unfortified wine drinks in
a motor vehicle shall not be unlawful if the container continues to be sealed
and is in the passenger area of a motor vehicle. is an unopened manufacturer's
original container or is transported in a locked container, in the trunk, or in the
area behind the last upright seat in a motor vehicle not equipped with a trunk.
Notwithstanding G.S. 18B-1010, the sale of more than two single-serving
unfortified wine drinks at one time shall not be unlawful if the single-serving
unfortified wine drinks are sold for delivery or consumption off the permittee's
premises. No single-serving unfortified wine by the drink ordered for
off-premises consumption shall be provided to any person other than the
purchaser of the single-serving unfortified wine drink, except that in the case
of delivery, the delivery service permittee through its employees or agents
may provide the single-serving unfortified wine drink to a person other than
the purchaser if the permittee or the permittee's employees or agents verify
that the person is over 21 years of age using age verification software requiring
the recipient to provide a form of photographic identification authorized in
G.S. 18B-302(d)(1).
…
(5) On-Premises Fortified Wine Permit. – An on-premises fortified wine permit
authorizes the retail sale of fortified wine for consumption on the premises,
either alone or mixed with other beverages, and the retail sale of fortified wine
in the manufacturer's original container for consumption off the premises. The
permit also authorizes the permittee to transfer fortified wine, not more than
four times per calendar year, to another on-premises fortified wine permittee
that is under common ownership or control as the transferor. Except as
authorized by this subdivision, transfers of wine by on-premises fortified wine
permittees, purchases of wine by a retail permittee from another retail
permittee for the purpose of resale, and sale of wine by a retail permittee to
another retail permittee for the purpose of resale are unlawful. In addition, a
particular brand of wine may be transferred only if both the transferor and
transferee are located within the territory designated between the winery and
the wholesaler on file with the Commission. Prior to or contemporaneous with
any such transfer, the transferor shall notify each wholesaler who distributes
the transferred product of the transfer. The notice shall be in writing or
verifiable electronic format and shall identify the transferor and transferee, the
date of the transfer, quantity, and items transferred. The holder of the permit
is authorized to ship fortified wine in closed containers to individual
purchasers inside and outside the State. Orders received by a winery by
telephone, Internet, mail, facsimile, or other off-premises means of
communication shall be shipped pursuant to a wine shipper permit and not
pursuant to this subdivision. The permit may be issued for any of the
following:
Senate Bill 552-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Restaurants.
b. Hotels.
c. Private clubs.
d. Community theatres.
e. Wineries.
f. Convention centers.
g. Bars.
h. The holder of a distillery permit authorized under G.S. 18B-1105.
i. Sports and entertainment venues.
j. Breweries.
Additionally, an on-premises fortified wine permit authorizes a permittee that
is a restaurant, hotel, private club, bar, brewery, or winery to sell at retail
single-serving fortified wine drinks for consumption off the premises,
including delivery by the permittee or a delivery service permittee.
Single-serving fortified wine drinks sold for consumption off the premises
must be sold with food and shall be packaged in a container with a secure lid
or cap and in a manner designed to prevent consumption without removal of
the lid or cap. The container shall be no greater than 24 fluid ounces.
Notwithstanding In accordance with G.S. 20-138.7, the transportation of
single-serving fortified wine drinks in a motor vehicle shall not be unlawful if
the container continues to be sealed and is in the passenger area of a motor
vehicle.is an unopened manufacturer's original container or is transported in a
locked container, in the trunk, or in the area behind the last upright seat in a
motor vehicle not equipped with a trunk. Notwithstanding G.S. 18B-1010, the
sale of more than two single-serving fortified wine drinks at one time shall not
be unlawful if the single-serving fortified wine drinks are sold for delivery or
consumption off the permittee's premises. No single-serving fortified wine by
the drink ordered for off-premises consumption shall be provided to any
person other than the purchaser of the single-serving fortified wine drink,
except that in the case of delivery, the delivery service permittee through its
employees or agents may provide the single-serving fortified wine drink to a
person other than the purchaser if the permittee or the permittee's employees
or agents verify that the person is over 21 years of age using age verification
software requiring the recipient to provide a form of photographic
identification authorized in G.S. 18B-302(d)(1).
…
(10) Mixed Beverages Permit. – A mixed beverages permit authorizes the retail
sale of mixed beverages for consumption on the premises. The permit also
authorizes a mixed beverages permittee to obtain an antique spirituous liquor
permit under subdivision (20) of this section and to use for culinary purposes
spirituous liquor lawfully purchased for use in mixed beverages. The permit
may be issued for any of the following:
a. Restaurants.
b. Hotels.
c. Private clubs.
d. Convention centers.
e. Community theatres.
f. Nonprofit organizations.
g. Political organizations.
h. Sports and entertainment venues.
i. Bars.
Page 6 Senate Bill 552-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
j. The holder of a distillery permit authorized under G.S. 18B-1105.
k. Breweries.
l. Wineries.
Additionally, a mixed beverages permit authorizes a permittee that is a
restaurant, hotel, private club, bar, brewery, winery, or the holder of a
distillery permit to sell at retail mixed beverages for consumption off the
premises, including delivery by the permittee or a delivery service permittee.
A mixed beverage sold for consumption off the premises must be sold with
food and shall be (i) a premixed cocktail in the manufacturer's original closed
container, or (ii) packaged in a container with a secure lid or cap, and in a
manner designed to prevent consumption without removal of the lid or cap.
The container shall be no greater than 24 fluid ounces. Notwithstanding In
accordance with G.S. 20-138.7, the transportation of a mixed beverage in a
motor vehicle shall not be unlawful if the container continues to be sealed and
is in the passenger area of a motor vehicle.is an unopened manufacturer's
original container or is transported in a locked container, in the trunk, or in the
area behind the last upright seat in a motor vehicle not equipped with a trunk.
Notwithstanding G.S. 18B-1010, the sale of more than one mixed beverage
drink at one time shall not be unlawful if the mixed beverage drinks are sold
for delivery or consumption off the permittee's premises. No mixed beverage
ordered for off-premises consumption shall be provided to any person other
than the purchaser of the mixed beverage, except that in the case of delivery,
the delivery service permittee through its employees or agents may provide
the mixed beverage to a person other than the purchaser if the permittee or the
permittee's employees or agents verify that the person is over 21 years of age
using age verification software requiring the recipient to provide a form of
photographic identification authorized in G.S. 18B-302(d)(1).
…."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 20-138.7(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Offense. – No person shall drive a motor vehicle on a highway or the right-of-way of
a highway:highway while both of the following conditions are met:
(1) While thereThere is an alcoholic beverage in the passenger area in other than
the unopened manufacturer's original container or a container that remains
securely sealed pursuant to G.S. 18B-1001(3), 18B-1001(5), or
18B-1001(10).container.
(2) While theThe driver is consuming alcohol or while alcohol remains in the
driver's body."
SECTION 3.(c) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

COUNTY MIXED BEVERAGE ELECTION AMENDMENT
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 18B-600(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) County Elections. – Any county may hold a malt beverage, unfortified wine, or ABC
store election. A county may hold a mixed beverage election only if (i) the county already
operates at least one county ABC store or a city located in the county operates at least one ABC
store, or (ii) a county election on ABC stores is to be held at the same time as the mixed beverage
election. Provided, if a county does not operate at least one ABC store, a mixed beverages
permittee may purchase liquor from an ABC store that is designated as a mixed beverage ABC
store operated by any local board operating in the same county as the permittee."
SECTION 4.(b) This section is retroactively effective October 1, 2024.

Senate Bill 552-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
BROWN BAGGING TECHNICAL CORRECTION
SECTION 5. G.S. 18B-603(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Mixed Beverage Elections. – If a mixed beverage election is held under
G.S. 18B-602(h) and the sale of mixed beverages is approved, the Commission may issue permits
to qualified persons and establishments in the jurisdiction that held the election as follows:
…
(4) The Commission may issue brown-bagging permits for bars, private clubs
clubs, and congressionally chartered veterans organizations but may no longer
issue and may not renew brown-bagging permits for restaurants, hotels, and
community theatres. A restaurant, hotel, or community theatre may not be
issued a mixed beverage permit under subdivision (1) until it surrenders its
brown-bagging permit.
…."

AIRPORT TECHNICAL CORRECTION
SECTION 6. G.S. 18B-300.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18B-300.3. Possession and consumption of alcoholic beverages in the security-screened
area of airports.
(a) During the hours of airport operation, any establishment permitted under subdivision
(1), (3), (5), or (10) of G.S. 18B-1000G.S. 18B-1001 and operating in the Transportation Security
Administration-screened portion of an airport may, with the written approval of the airport
authority, sell the alcoholic beverages it is permitted to sell for consumption throughout the
Transportation Security Administration-screened portion of the establishment's respective airport
terminal.
(b) An alcoholic beverage served for consumption throughout an establishment's airport
terminal shall be served in a container that meets all of the following requirements:
(1) The container is not comprised of glass.
(2) The container displays, in no less than 12-point font, the statement, "Drink
Responsibly – Be 21."
(3) The container shall not hold more than 16 fluid ounces.
(c) A customer may purchase and consume alcoholic beverages throughout the interior
of the Transportation Security Administration-screened portion of the respective airport terminal,
provided that the purchase is from an approved establishment permitted under subdivision (1),
(3), (5), or (10) of G.S. 18B-1000.G.S. 18B-1001.
(d) This section applies only to airports that service airplanes boarding at least 150,000
passengers annually."

CLARIFY PERMISSION TO TAKE MIXED BEVERAGES ONTO PERMITTED
PREMISES IN A SOCIAL DISTRICT
SECTION 7. G.S. 18B-300.1(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) Limitations on Open Containers. – Except where otherwise allowed by local
ordinance, the possession and consumption of an open container of an alcoholic beverage in a
social district is subject to all of the following requirements:
…
(6) Notwithstanding G.S. 18B-300 and G.S. 18B-301, a permittee or
non-permittee business may allow a customer to possess and consume on the
business's premises alcoholic beverages purchased from a permittee in the
social district. A permittee business that is not permitted to sell mixed
beverages may allow a customer to possess and consume on the business's
premises mixed beverages purchased from a mixed beverages permittee in the
social district."
Page 8 Senate Bill 552-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 552-First Edition Page 9